Alaska, session 34, SB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.88.040 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 44.88.040. Chair and vice-chair [CHAIRMAN AND VICE- 06 CHAIRMAN]. The members of the authority shall elect a chair every two years 07 [CHAIRMAN] from among themselves. A vice-chair [VICE-CHAIRMAN] may be 08 elected by the authority from among its other members. The vice-chair [VICE- 09 CHAIRMAN] presides over all meetings in the absence of the chair [CHAIRMAN] 10 and has other duties which the authority may direct. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.